Virginia statutes. Title 9.1. Commonwealth Public Safety.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 9.1-1100.
Department of Forensic Science created; Director.

There is hereby created in the executive branch of state government, a Department of Forensic Science (the Department), which formerly existed as a division within the Department of Criminal Justice Services. The Department shall be headed by a Director appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly if in session when such appointment is made, and if not in session, then at its next succeeding session. In making his appointment, the Governor shall choose a candidate meeting the qualifications recommended by the Forensic Science Board created pursuant to §

9.1-1109

. The Director shall serve for a term of six years, or until his successor shall be appointed and qualified. Any vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment.

The Director, under the direction and control of the Governor, shall exercise the powers and perform the duties conferred or imposed upon him by law and perform such other duties required by the Governor or requested by the Forensic Science Board created pursuant to §

9.1-1109

.

History.

2005, cc. 868, 881.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, cc. 868 and 881, cl. 3 provides:
“That as of July 1, 2005, the Department of Forensic Science shall be deemed successor in interest to the Division of Forensic Science of the Department of Criminal Justice Services to the extent that this act transfers powers and duties. All right, title and interest in and to any real or tangible personal property vested in the Division of Forensic Science of the Department of Criminal Justice Services shall be transferred to and taken as standing in the name of the Department of Forensic Science.”

Acts 2005, cc. 868 and 881, cl. 4 provides:
“That the Governor may transfer an appropriation or any portion thereof within a state agency established, abolished, or otherwise affected by the provisions of this act, or from one such agency to another, to support the changes in organization or responsibility resulting from or required by the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2005, cc. 868 and 881, cl. 5 provides:
“That any general fund and nongeneral fund positions at the Division of Forensic Science of the Department of Criminal Justice Services on July 1, 2005, shall be transferred to the Department of Forensic Science to support the changes in organization or responsibility resulting from or required by the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2005, cc. 868 and 881, cl. 6 provides:
“That all rules and regulations adopted by the Department of Criminal Justice Services which are in effect as of July 1, 2005, and which pertain to the subject of this act, shall remain in full force and effect until altered, amended, or rescinded by the Board of Forensic Science.”

Acts 2005, cc. 868 and 881, cl. 7 provides:
“That on and after July 1, 2005, any reference in the Code of Virginia or in the Acts of Assembly to the Division of Forensic Science shall be construed to mean the Department of Forensic Science.”

Acts 2005, cc. 868 and 881, cl. 8 provides:
“That the Department of Criminal Justice Services shall continue to provide administrative support services to the Department of Forensic Science.”

Acts 2005, cc. 868 and 881, cl. 9 provides:
“That the Department of Criminal Justice Services and the Division of Forensic Science shall complete a Memorandum of Understanding detailing the activities related to the Division of Forensic Science becoming an independent agency. The Memorandum of Understanding shall include, but not be limited to, the transfer of existing equipment and personnel and such administrative services to be provided by the Department of Criminal Justice Services.”

Acts 2009, c. 172, cl. 1, effective March 23, 2009, provides: “§ 1. The Forensic Science Board shall continue to exercise all necessary diligence to expeditiously implement and achieve the goal of the program described in Item 408 B of Chapter 879 of the 2008 Acts of Assembly.

“§ 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Forensic Science Board and other state agencies may receive and disseminate to individuals, state agencies, and private organizations involved in the completion of the program described in Item 408 B of Chapter 879 of the 2008 Acts of Assembly, (i) all Virginia criminal history record information, and (ii) any other information that may be necessary to the successful and timely completion of the program.

“§ 3. All state agencies shall provide such assistance as may be requested by the Forensic Science Board to aid in the successful and timely completion of the program described in Item 408 B of Chapter 879 of the 2008 Acts of Assembly.

“§ 4. To the extent available, the Forensic Science Board shall utilize the services of pro bono attorneys and may utilize the services of such other individuals, state agencies, or private organizations as the Forensic Science Board determines will assist in the successful and timely completion of the program described in Item 408 B of Chapter 879 of the 2008 Acts of Assembly for all individuals required to be notified. The services of such individuals shall include, but not be limited to, (i) verifying information concerning convictions to determine the individuals to be notified, (ii) notifying those individuals to whom notification has not been sent, (iii) notifying those categories of individuals as was determined by the Virginia State Crime Commission to be in need of additional notification efforts at its December 9, 2008, meeting, and (iv) notifying any additional individual for whom receipt of notification is otherwise uncertain, to be determined by the Chairman of the Virginia State Crime Commission.

“§ 5. Any individual, state agency, or private organization volunteering services in the program pursuant to § 4 shall (i) execute a waiver of liability and a confidentiality agreement on forms prepared by the Attorney General of Virginia; (ii) participate in training, approved by the Virginia State Bar, on the process, manner, and conduct of the notifications; and (iii) agree to fully report to the Forensic Science Board the results of notification efforts and other particulars of participation in the program. In addition, any attorney, or other person with whom a legally recognizable confidential or privileged relationship could be created, who participates in the program, shall agree that he will advise any person that he attempts to notify pursuant to the program that no confidential or privileged relationship created may impair the required reporting of the results of the notification and that all information relevant to the notification will be reported to the Forensic Science Board.

“§ 6. The Office of the Attorney General shall prepare the forms required pursuant to § 5 within 30 days of enactment of this legislation. The training to be provided through the Virginia State Bar shall be available within 120 days of enactment. Any individual, state agency, or private organization volunteering services in the program pursuant to § 4 shall report the results of their notification efforts to the Forensic Science Board on or before October 1, 2009. The Forensic Science Board shall make a final report to the General Assembly, the Governor, and the Virginia State Crime Commission detailing the program, including, but not limited to, the notification procedures used, the number of individuals contacted, responses made by contacted individuals, resources utilized, and aggregated results of any DNA testing performed as a result of the notifications and responses, no later than December 1, 2009.”

§ 9.1-1100.1.
Certified mail; subsequent mail or notices may be sent by regular mail.

Whenever in this chapter the Board or the Department is required to send any mail or notice by certified mail and such mail or notice is sent certified mail, return receipt requested, then any subsequent, identical mail or notice that is sent by the Board or the Department may be sent by regular mail.

History.

2011, c. 566.

§ 9.1-1101.
Powers and duties of the Department.

It shall be the responsibility of the Department to provide forensic laboratory services upon request of the Superintendent of State Police; the Chief Medical Examiner, the Assistant Chief Medical Examiners, and local medical examiners; any attorney for the Commonwealth; any chief of police, sheriff, or sergeant responsible for law enforcement in the jurisdiction served by him; any local fire department; the head of any private police department that has been designated as a criminal justice agency by the Department of Criminal Justice Services as defined by §

9.1-101

; or any state agency in any criminal matter. The Department shall provide such services to any federal investigatory agency within available resources.

The Department shall:

Provide forensic laboratory services to all law-enforcement agencies throughout the Commonwealth and provide laboratory services, research, and scientific investigations for agencies of the Commonwealth as needed;

Establish and maintain a DNA testing program in accordance with Article 1.1 (§

19.2-310.2

et seq.) of Chapter 18 of Title 19.2 to determine identification characteristics specific to an individual; and

Test the accuracy of equipment used to test the blood alcohol content of breath at least once every six months. Only equipment found to be accurate shall be used to test the blood alcohol content of breath.

The Department shall have the power and duty to:

Receive, administer, and expend all funds and other assistance available for carrying out the purposes of this chapter;

Make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and execution of its powers under this chapter including, but not limited to, contracts with the United States, units of general local government or combinations thereof in Virginia or other states, and with agencies and departments of the Commonwealth; and

Perform such other acts as may be necessary or convenient for the effective performance of its duties.

The Director may appoint and employ a deputy director and such other personnel as are needed to carry out the duties and responsibilities conferred by this chapter.

History.

2005, cc. 868, 881; 2006, cc. 327, 551; 2009, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 1, 4; 2011, c. 638.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 327 and 551 are identical, and added subsection C; and redesignated former subsection C as subsection D.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, c. 1, effective August 21, 2009, and Sp. Sess. I, c. 4, effective September 15, 2009, are identical, and added subdivision B 3 and made related changes.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 638 inserted “the head of any private police department that has been designated as a criminal justice agency by the Department of Criminal Justice Services as defined by §

9.1-101

” in subsection A.

Law Review.

For article, “Invalid Forensic Science Testimony and Wrongful Convictions,” see 95 Va. L. Rev. 1 (2009).

§ 9.1-1101.1.
Purchase of forensic laboratory services.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Department may make and enter into contracts or agreements for forensic laboratory services with any laboratory located in the Commonwealth that is operated by an institution of higher education located in the Commonwealth or a corporate entity that is wholly owned by an institution of higher education located in the Commonwealth, which institution offers a program leading to the Doctor of Pharmacy degree and is accredited by the Accreditation Council for Pharmacy Education and the Southern Association of Colleges and Schools. No such contract or agreement for forensic laboratory services shall be made or entered into with any other laboratory, except as provided in subsection B.

The Department may request, and the Director of the Division of Purchases and Supply of the Department of General Services may grant, an exemption from the provisions of subsection A if (i) a laboratory described in subsection A does not meet the reasonable requirements of the Department; (ii) a laboratory described in subsection A cannot provide the forensic laboratory services required by the Department; (iii) forensic laboratory services identical to those provided by the laboratory described in subsection A can be obtained at a cost that is at least 10 percent less than the cost of obtaining such forensic laboratory services from the laboratory described in subsection A, as evidenced by a verified request for pricing; or (iv) in cases in which the Department has issued a Request for Proposals, a proposal submitted by a laboratory other than a laboratory described in subsection A has received a ranking that is at least 10 percent higher than the ranking of any laboratory described in subsection A. In any case in which an exemption is granted pursuant to this subsection, the Director of the Division of Purchases and Supply of the Department of General Services shall submit a written justification for the exception to the Directors of the Department of Forensic Science and the Department of General Services.

History.

2019, cc. 478, 479.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 418 E, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding §

9.1-1101.1

, Code of Virginia, the Department of Forensic Science shall not enter into contracts or agreements for forensic laboratory services that i) require additional general fund resources for laboratory services that can otherwise be procured at lower costs, or ii) impose additional regulatory burdens on the staff of the Department to implement.”

§ 9.1-1101.2.
Possession or transfer of unlawful items by Department employees while engaged in the performance of official duties.

Whenever the possession or transfer of any item or material is prohibited by law, such prohibition shall not apply to any Department employee who possesses or transfers such prohibited item or material while engaged in the performance of his official duties.

History.

2019, c. 507.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in Acts 2019, c. 507 having been

9.1-1101.1

.

§ 9.1-1102.
Department to be isolated; security and protection of evidence.

The Department and its facilities shall be located so as to ensure the protection of evidence.

The Department shall provide for security and protection of evidence, official samples, and all other samples submitted to the Department for analysis or examination.

The Department shall ensure that its services are performed by skilled professionals who are qualified to testify in court regarding such services.

History.

2005, cc. 868, 881.

§ 9.1-1103.
Forensic Science Academy.

The Forensic Science Academy, formerly within the Division of Forensic Science, shall be transferred to the Department, and shall provide advanced training to law-enforcement agencies in the location, collection, and preservation of evidence.

History.

2005, cc. 868, 881.

§ 9.1-1104.
Rights of accused person or his attorney to results of investigation or to investigation.

Upon the request of any person accused of a crime or upon the request of an accused person’s attorney, the Department or the Division of Consolidated Laboratory Services shall furnish to the accused or his attorney the results of any investigation that has been conducted by it and that is related in any way to a crime for which the person is accused. In any case in which an attorney of record for a person accused of violation of any criminal law of the Commonwealth, or the accused, may desire a scientific investigation, he shall, by motion filed before the court in which the charge is pending, certify that in good faith he believes that a scientific investigation may be relevant to the criminal charge. The motion shall be heard ex parte as soon as practicable, and the court shall, after a hearing upon the motion and being satisfied as to the correctness of the certification, order that the same be performed by the Department or the Division of Consolidated Laboratory Services and shall prescribe in its order the method of custody, transfer, and return of evidence submitted for scientific investigation. Upon the request of the attorney for the Commonwealth of the jurisdiction in which the charge is pending, he shall be furnished the results of the scientific investigation.

History.

2005, cc. 868, 881.

Cross references.

As to personal information systems that are exempt from the Government Data Collection and Dissemination Practices Act, see §

2.2-3802

. As to samples for DNA data bank, see §

19.2-310.5

. As to contents and form of the petition based on previously unknown or untested human biological evidence of actual innocence, see §

19.2-327.3

.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-1619. Motion for Handwriting Analysis; No. 9-1620. Order for Handwriting Analysis.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Appeal and Error, § 11.5.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Ex parte motion not allowed. —

Order for forensic testing issued pursuant to §

9.1-1104

should not be issued ex parte and under seal. Commonwealth v. Torres, 99 Va. Cir. 221, 2018 Va. Cir. LEXIS 138 (Fairfax County Aug. 13, 2018).

§ 9.1-1105.
Reexamination by independent experts.

Independent experts employed by (i) an attorney of record for a person accused of violation of any criminal law of the Commonwealth or (ii) the accused, for the purpose of reexamination of materials previously examined in any laboratory of the Department, shall conduct their analyses or examinations independently of the facilities, equipment, or supplies of the Department.

History.

2005, cc. 868, 881.

§ 9.1-1106.
Disposal of certain hazardous materials.

Any material that is seized in any criminal investigation and that is deemed to be hazardous to health and safety, may be disposed of upon written application of the Department to the attorney for the Commonwealth in the city or county where the material is seized or where any criminal prosecution in which the material is proposed to be evidence is pending. Upon receipt thereof, the attorney for the Commonwealth shall file the application in the circuit court of such county or city. A sworn analysis report signed by a person designated by the Director of the Department shall accompany the application for disposal and shall clearly identify and designate the material to be disposed of. The application shall state the nature of the hazardous materials, the quantity thereof, the location where seized, the person from whom the materials were seized, and the manner whereby the materials shall be destroyed.

When the ownership of the hazardous material is known, notice shall be given to the owner at least three days prior to any hearing relating to the destruction, and, if any criminal charge is pending in any court as a result of the seizure, the notice shall be given to the accused if other than the owner.

Upon receipt of the analysis report and the application, the court may order the destruction of all, or a part of, the material. However, a sufficient and representative quantity of the material shall be retained to permit an independent analysis when a criminal prosecution may result from the seizure. A return under oath, reporting the time, place, and manner of destruction, shall be made to the courts. Copies of the analysis report, application, order, and return shall be made a part of the record of any criminal prosecution. The sworn analysis report shall be admissible as evidence to the same extent as the disposed-of material would have been admissible.

History.

2005, cc. 868, 881.

§ 9.1-1107.
Disposal of certain other property after analysis.

Personal property, including drugs, not disposed of under §

9.1-1106

, that has been submitted to the Department for analysis or examination and that has not been reclaimed by the agency submitting the property for analysis or examination, may be disposed of by the Department in accordance with this section if, after the expiration of 120 days after the receipt by the Department of the property, the Director notifies the circuit court of the county or city from which the property was taken, in writing, that the analysis or examination has been completed, and a report submitted to the agency that the property has not been reclaimed by the agency submitting it and that the Department proposes to dispose of the property. The notice shall state the nature of the property, the quantity thereof, the location where seized, the name of the accused, if known, and the proposed method of disposing of the property.

When the ownership of the property is known, a copy of the notice shall be sent simultaneously with the notice to the court to the owner, or, if any criminal charge is pending in any court relating to the property, the copy shall be sent to the accused at his last known address. Notice shall be by certified mail. The court, within 30 days after receipt of the notice, may direct that the property be disposed of by the Department, by an alternative method designed to preserve the property, at the expense of the agency submitting the property to the Department. If the court does not so direct within the 30-day period, then the Department may dispose of the property by the method set out in the notice. Copies of the analysis report and notice shall be made a part of the record of any criminal prosecution. The report, if sworn to, shall be admissible as evidence to the same extent as the disposed-of property would have been admissible.

History.

2005, cc. 868, 881.

§ 9.1-1108.
Disposal of property held by Department for more than 15 years.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

9.1-1106

and

9.1-1107

, the Department may file an application in the Circuit Court of the City of Richmond seeking an order authorizing the disposal of all personal property, including drugs, received by the Department more than 15 years prior to the filing of the application. The application, under oath, shall list each item of property, the date of submission to the Department, the agency or individual submitting the property, any previous court orders entered regarding the storage of the property, and the proposed method of disposal. The application shall also state that written notice by first-class mail was given to each agency or individual submitting property listed at least 30 days prior to the application, and that no agency or individual objected to the disposal. A return, under oath, reporting the time, place, and manner of disposal, shall be made to the court.

History.

2005, cc. 868, 881.